Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 20.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-4843
Effect of anatomical gift on advance
health care directive.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1)
Advance health care directive means a power of attorney for health care or
a record signed or authorized by a prospective donor containing the prospective
donor's direction concerning a health care decision for the prospective donor;

(2)
Declaration means a record signed by a prospective donor specifying the circumstances
under which life-sustaining treatment may be withheld or withdrawn from the
prospective donor; and

(3) Health care decision means any decision
regarding the health care of the prospective donor.

(b) If a prospective
donor has a declaration or advance health care directive and the terms of
the declaration or directive and the express or implied terms of a potential
anatomical gift are in conflict with regard to the administration of measures
necessary to ensure the medical suitability of a part for transplantation
or therapy, the prospective donor's attending physician and prospective donor
shall confer to resolve the conflict. If the prospective donor is incapable
of resolving the conflict, an agent acting under the prospective donor's declaration
or directive, or, if none or the agent is not reasonably available, another
person authorized by law other than the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act
to make health care decisions on behalf of the prospective donor, shall act
for the donor to resolve the conflict. The conflict must be resolved as expeditiously
as possible. Information relevant to the resolution of the conflict may be
obtained from the appropriate procurement organization and any other person
authorized to make an anatomical gift for the prospective donor under section
71-4832. Before resolution of the conflict, measures necessary to ensure the
medical suitability of the part from a prospective donor may not be administered
if it is determined that the administration of those measures would not provide
the prospective donor with appropriate end-of-life care or it can be anticipated
by reasonable medical judgment that such measures would cause the prospective
donor's death other than by the prospective donor's underlying pathology.
If the conflict is not resolved expeditiously, the direction of the declaration
or advanced directive controls.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 20.